Wyoming, session 2025, HB0130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi) and 39-13-102(k) are amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

HB0130

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0321
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xlvi) A portion of a single family residential
property used as a primary residence as provided in this
paragraph. The following shall apply to this exemption:

(A) The amount of the exemption under this
paragraph shall be fifty percent (50%) of the fair market
value of a single family residential property that is used
as a primary residence, provided that the exemption shall
only apply to the first two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) of the fair market value of the single family
residential property;

(B) As used in this paragraph:

(I) "Primary residence" means a single
family residential property where the person claiming the
exemption actually resides for not less than eight (8)
months of the year. If the person claiming the exemption or
a member of the person's immediate family is an active duty
member of the armed forces and service in the armed forces
HB0130

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0321
is the reason that the person cannot meet the eight (8)
month requirement specified in this subdivision, the person
shall qualify for the exemption as long as the single
family residential property is the legal domicile of the
applicable member of the armed forces;

(II) "Single family residential
property" means a structure intended for human habitation,
including a house, modular home, mobile home, townhouse or
condominium that is a privately owned single family
dwelling unit.

(C) The county treasurer for each county
shall keep accurate records of the reduction in tax
revenues caused by the exemption provided by this paragraph
for the county and for each governmental entity for which
notification is made pursuant to W.S. 39‑13‑104(k) and shall
report that information to the department. The department
shall compile and verify the information received from each
county and shall verify any reductions in the distribution
of mill levies to the school foundation program account
under W.S. 21-13-303. Subject to appropriation of funds by
the legislature, the department shall distribute verified
HB0130

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0321
amounts to each county treasurer for distribution as
provided in W.S. 39‑13‑111 in an amount necessary to fully
compensate each government entity for the reduction in tax
revenues resulting from the exemption in this paragraph. If
the amount available under this subparagraph is
insufficient to fully compensate each government entity for
the reduction in tax revenues, the department shall
distribute funds to each government entity on a pro rata
basis;

(D) A person applying for an exemption
under this paragraph shall provide all information as
required by rule of the department and on a form approved
by the department. The department may by rule allow a
claimant to confirm qualification for the exemption in
subsequent years by contacting the assessor's office by
telephone, mail or other communication method;

(E) The exemption under this paragraph
shall not apply for tax year 2027 and thereafter.

39-13-102. Administration; confidentiality.

HB0130

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0321
(k) On or before September 1, county assessors shall
certify the exemptions granted pursuant to W.S.
39-11-105(a)(xxiv) and (xlvi) to the department. On or
before October 1 the state treasurer out of funds
appropriated for that purpose shall reimburse each county
treasurer for the amount of taxes which would have been
collected if the property was not exempt. The county
treasurer shall distribute the revenue to each governmental
entity in the actual amount of taxes lost due to the
exemption.

Section 2. The exemption provided by this act shall
first apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2025.

Section 3.

(a) 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section
321 as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94,
Section 321 and further amended by 2024 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 118, Section 318, 2022 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 51, Section 325 as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 94, Section 323 and further amended by 2024
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 318 and 2024
HB0130

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0321
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 323 are
repealed.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
impair existing expenditures, awards, agreements, contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date
of this section.

(c) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and
9-4-207, all unobligated funds that are reverted due to the
appropriations that are repealed in subsection (a) of this
section shall be credited to the general fund regardless of
the original source of the appropriation.

Section 4. There is appropriated one hundred
seventy‑six million dollars ($176,000,000.00) from the
general fund to the department of revenue for the purposes
of providing reimbursement to government entities as
provided in W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi)(C) for losses in
revenue resulting from the homeowner tax exemption as
created by section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall
be for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and ending June 30, 2027. This appropriation shall not
HB0130

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0321
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2027. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the department's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0130